Kentucky statutes. TITLE XIX Public Safety and Morals
Propane Gas Industry

234.270.
Declaration of public policy.

It is declared to be in the interest of the public welfare that persons involved in the production, transportation, and sale of propane and the manufacture and distribution of propane utilization equipment shall be permitted and encouraged to act jointly and in cooperation to develop programs to enhance consumer and employee safety, to provide research and development, and to inform and educate the public about safety and other issues associated with the use of propane.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 182, § 1, effective July 15, 1998.

234.272.
Definitions for KRS 234.270 to 234.302.

As used in KRS

234.270

to

234.302

, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of the Department of Housing, Buildings and Construction;

“Council” means the Kentucky Propane Education and Research Council created in accordance with KRS

234.290

;

“Department” means the state Department of Housing, Buildings and Construction;

“Education” means any action to provide information regarding propane, propane equipment, mechanical and technical practices relating to the use of propane, and propane uses to consumers and members of the propane industry;

“Industry” means those persons involved in the production, transportation, and sale of propane and in the manufacture and distribution of propane utilization equipment;

“Industry trade association” means an organization representing the propane industry which is exempt from tax, under Section 501(c)(3) or (c)(6) of the Internal Revenue Code;

“Odorized propane” means propane to which an odorant has been added;

“Person” means any individual, corporation, partnership, association, cooperative, or other business entity;

“Producer” means the owner of propane at the time it is recovered at a gas processing plant or refinery, without regard to the state in which actual production occurs;

“Propane” means a hydrocarbon whose chemical composition is predominately C3H8, whether recovered from natural gas or crude oil, and includes liquefied petroleum gases and mixtures thereof;

“Public member” means a member of the council representing significant users of propane, public safety officials, state regulatory officials, or other groups knowledgeable about propane;

“Research” means any type of study, investigation, or other activity designed to advance the image, desirability, usage, marketability, efficiency, or safety of propane and to further the development of this information;

“Retail marketer” means a person engaged primarily in the sale of odorized propane to the final user of the product or to retail propane dispensers;

“Retail propane dispenser” means a person who sells odorized propane to the final user of the product but is not engaged primarily in the business of these sales; and

“Supplier” means a person, other than a producer, who is the owner of propane in the Commonwealth at the time of odorization or who is the owner of odorized propane at the time it is imported into the Commonwealth.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 182, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 2010, ch. 24, § 503, effective July 15, 2010.

234.274.
Authority for administrative regulations.

The commissioner may promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to implement the provisions of KRS

234.270

to

234.302

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 182, § 3, effective July 15, 1998; 2010, ch. 24, § 504, effective July 15, 2010.

234.276.
Association meeting or activity not considered illegal or in restraint of trade.

No association meeting or activity undertaken to carry out the provisions of KRS

234.270

to

234.302

and intended to benefit all persons involved in the production, transportation, and sale of propane and the manufacture and distribution of propane utilization equipment shall be deemed or considered illegal or in restraint of trade.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 182, § 4, effective July 15, 1998.

234.278.
Referendum to permit assessment — Purpose of assessments.

Producers, suppliers, and retail marketers of propane shall be permitted by referendum, subject to the provisions of KRS

234.270

to

234.302

, to levy upon themselves an assessment on odorized propane and provide for the collection of the assessment for the purpose of financing or contributing toward the financing of a program of research, market development, and education to increase the consumption, use, sale, and markets for propane and toward the financing of programs to enhance consumer and employee education and safety.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 182, § 5, effective July 15, 1998.

234.280.
Application to conduct referendum — Content of application form — Publication of form.

Any existing industry trade organization which is fairly representative of the propane industry in Kentucky, such as the Kentucky Propane Gas Association, may at any time after July 15, 1998, make application to the commissioner on forms prescribed by the department for certification and approval for the purpose of conducting a referendum among producers, suppliers, and retail marketers upon the question of levying an assessment under the provisions of KRS

234.270

to

234.302

and collecting and utilizing the assessment for the purpose stated in the referendum. The application forms shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

Applicant’s name;

Applicant’s address;

Date;

Program to be undertaken;

Brief statement of how the program is to be implemented;

Referendum to be conducted on a statewide basis;

Proposed effective date of the program; and

Signature of the applicant.

Upon receipt of the application, the commissioner shall publish the application through the medium of the public press in the state within ten (10) days of receipt.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 182, § 6, effective July 15, 1998; 2010, ch. 24, § 505, effective July 15, 2010.

234.282.
Association authorized to hold referendum.

Upon being certified by the commissioner, the association in KRS 234.280(1) shall be fully authorized and empowered to hold a referendum among producers, suppliers, and retail marketers on the question of whether the industry shall levy upon itself an assessment for the purpose stated in KRS

234.270

to

234.302

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 182, § 7, effective July 15, 1998; 2010, ch. 24, § 506, effective July 15, 2010.

234.284.
Referendum to be statewide — Basing voting rights — Question for voters.

Any referendum conducted under the provisions of KRS

234.270

to

234.302

shall be held on a statewide basis. Voting rights in the referendum shall be based on the volume of propane produced or odorized propane sold in the Commonwealth in the previous calendar year and shall be proportional to the gallons sold. In the referendum, persons eligible for participation shall vote upon the question of whether there shall be levied an annual assessment in the amount set forth in the call for the referendum.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 182, § 8, effective July 15, 1998.

234.286.
Commissioner to supervise referendum — Expenses — Conducting referendum — Voter to certify volume of propane represented by vote — Mechanism for notification of eligible voters.

The manner, conduct, and management of any referendum held under the provisions of KRS

234.270

to

234.302

shall be under the supervision and direction of the commissioner. Any and all expenses in connection with the initial referendum shall be borne by the association conducting the referendum. Any and all expenses in connection with subsequent referenda shall be borne by the council.

With respect to any referendum conducted under the provisions of KRS

234.270

to

234.302

, the association or council responsible for the referendum shall select an independent auditing firm, subject to the approval of the commissioner, to conduct the referendum.

All persons voting in the referendum shall certify to the independent auditing firm the volume of propane represented by their vote. The information provided under this subsection shall be considered proprietary and shall remain confidential.

The association or council responsible for the referendum shall develop a mechanism for notifying those persons eligible to vote in the referendum. Notice of the referendum, at a minimum, shall be given to all retail marketers in Kentucky holding a “Class A” license from the department and notice shall be published in existing industry publications with significant circulation within the Commonwealth.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 182, § 9, effective July 15, 1998; 2010, ch. 24, § 507, effective July 15, 2010.

234.288.
Referendum results — Issuance of order — Initial and annual assessments.

The results of the referendum, as certified by the independent auditing firm, shall be submitted to the commissioner within thirty (30) days of certification.

For the purpose of the referendum, producers and suppliers shall be considered a single class. Upon approval of those persons representing two-thirds (2/3) of the total volume of odorized propane voted in the retail marketer class and approval of those persons representing two-thirds (2/3) of the total volume of propane voted in the producer and supplier class, the commissioner shall issue an order authorizing the assessment.

The initial assessment proposed shall be no greater than one-tenth of one cent ($0.001) per gallon of odorized propane. Thereafter, the annual assessment shall be set by the council in an amount adequate to cover the cost of plans and programs developed by the council. In no event shall the annual assessment levied under the provisions of the referendum exceed one-half of one cent ($0.005) per gallon of odorized propane unless approved by the majority of those voting in both the retail marketer class and the producer and supplier class in a separate referendum. The increase in the annual assessment as provided for in this subsection is limited to one-tenth of one cent ($0.001) per year.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 182, § 10, effective July 15, 1998; 2010, ch. 24, § 508, effective July 15, 2010.

234.290.
Kentucky Propane Education and Research Council — Appointment of members — Terms and compensation.

There is hereby established the Kentucky Propane Education and Research Council composed of eleven (11) members appointed by the commissioner. Five (5) members shall represent retail marketers, five (5) members shall represent producers and suppliers, and one (1) member shall be the public member as defined in KRS

234.272

.

Council members representing retail marketers, producers, and suppliers shall be appointed based on the nomination of an industry trade association certified according to KRS

234.280

. No member representing these categories may be appointed unless recommended by a certified industry trade association. Members in these categories shall be full-time employees or owners of businesses in the industry.

No employee of a certified industry trade association shall serve as a member of the council and no member of the council may serve concurrently as an officer or member of the board of directors of a certified industry trade association. A director of a certified association may serve as an ex officio nonvoting member of the council.

No more than one (1) representative from any company or its affiliate may serve on the council at any time.

In nominating members to the council, a certified association shall consider broad-based representation including:

Gas processors and oil refiners among producers;

Interstate and intrastate operators among retail marketers;

Large and small companies among producers, suppliers, and retail marketers; and

Diverse geographic regions of the state.

Council members shall serve three (3) year terms except that for initial appointments, four (4) members shall be appointed to one (1) year terms, four (4) members to two (2) year terms, and three (3) members to three (3) year terms. Within ninety (90) days after July 15, 1998, certified industry trade organizations shall submit nominations to the commissioner. No member shall serve more than two (2) consecutive terms.

Council members shall receive no compensation for their services. Only the public member may be reimbursed for reasonable and necessary expenses directly related to attendance at council meetings.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 182, § 11, effective July 15, 1998; 2010, ch. 24, § 509, effective July 15, 2010.

234.292.
Annual assessment — Requirements of council.

The council shall establish the annual assessment subject to the limitations of KRS 234.288(3) to be paid by the owner of odorized propane at the time of odorization or at the time of import of odorized propane into the state. The assessment shall be made based on the volume of odorized propane sold for final use within the Commonwealth.

The assessment shall be listed as a separate line item on the bill and labeled “Kentucky Propane Education and Research Assessment.” Assessments collected from purchasers of propane are payable to the council on a monthly basis and are due by the twenty-fifth day of the month following the month of collection.

The council may establish an alternative means of collecting the assessment if another method is found to be more efficient or effective. The council may establish a late payment charge and rate of interest to be imposed on any person who fails to remit to the council any amount due by the date listed in subsection (2) of this section.

The council shall elect its own chair and may elect other officers as necessary. The council shall determine its business structure and adopt rules and bylaws for the conduct of its business. The council shall establish procedures for the solicitation of industry comments and recommendations on plans and programs financed by the assessments.

The council shall keep minutes, books, and records that clearly reflect all of the acts and transactions of the council. The minutes, books, and records shall be made available to the members of the council, the commissioner, and persons paying the assessment.

The council shall, at the beginning of each fiscal year, prepare and submit to the commissioner a budget. The commissioner shall review and comment on the proposed budget.

The books of the council shall be audited by a certified public accountant at least once each fiscal year. Copies of the audit shall be provided to the members of the council and the commissioner.

The council may contract with an industry association certified under KRS

234.280

for administrative and other services subject to the limitation in KRS 234.294(2).

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 182, § 12, effective July 15, 1998; 2010, ch. 24, § 510, effective July 15, 2010.

234.294.
Funds — Use — Disbursement.

The funds, including donations from individuals, associations, concerns, corporations, and grants from state or federal governmental agencies, shall be used for the purpose of promoting and stimulating, by research, market development, and education, the increased use and sale of propane and increased consumer and employee safety. None of these funds shall be used to lobby as defined in KRS

6.611

. The council shall use and disburse the funds as follows:

The council may refund to the industry association certified under KRS

234.280

the costs and expenses incurred in the conduct of the initial referendum. The council shall bear the cost of any subsequent referenda provided for in KRS

234.270

to

234.302

;

The council may spend or disburse the necessary funds for administrative costs and expenses, but no more than fifteen percent (15%) of the funds collected in any year shall be utilized in this manner; and

The balance remaining shall be used for the purposes provided in KRS

234.270

to

234.302

, as determined by the council.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 182, § 13, effective July 15, 1998.

234.296.
Request for refund of assessment — Requirements.

If the referendum is carried in the affirmative and the assessment is levied and collected as provided, any person upon and against whom the assessment shall have been levied and collected under the provisions of KRS

234.270

to

234.302

, if dissatisfied with the assessment and the result thereof, may demand of and shall receive from the council a refund of the assessment collected, if the demand for refund is made in writing within thirty (30) days from the date on which the assessment is collected. Each refund request shall be accompanied by written proof of the assessment charged.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 182, § 14, effective July 15, 1998.

234.298.
Petition for termination of council and assessment program by referendum vote — Timing of referendum — Termination proceedings.

Upon petition to the commissioner by producers, suppliers, and retail marketers representing thirty-five percent (35%) of the volume of propane in each class, the council shall conduct a referendum to determine if the industry favors termination of the council and the assessment. Termination shall not take effect unless it is approved by persons representing a majority of the total volume of odorized propane voted in the retail marketer class and by persons representing a majority of the total volume of propane voted in the producer and supplier class.

The council shall conduct a referendum five (5) years after the date of the first referendum and each subsequent five (5) year period to determine if the assessment should be continued or terminated.

If the council expresses in writing its desire to the commissioner to discontinue the assessment program and terminate the program, the commissioner, after reviewing the request and conducting whatever proceedings are deemed appropriate and necessary in connection with the request, may terminate the program effective at the end of the calendar year in which the action is taken.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 182, § 15, effective July 15, 1998; 2010, ch. 24, § 511, effective July 15, 2010.

234.300.
Propane pricing.

In all cases, the price of propane shall be determined by market forces. Consistent with the antitrust laws, the council may take no action and no provision of KRS

234.270

to

234.302

may be interpreted as establishing an agreement to pass along to consumers the cost of the assessments provided for in KRS

234.270

to

234.302

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 182, § 16, effective July 15, 1998.

234.302.
Violations — Restraining order and preliminary injunction.

When in the judgment of the council or an association certified under KRS

234.280

, a person has engaged in or is about to engage in any acts or practices that constitute a violation of any of the provisions of KRS

234.270

to

234.302

, the council or the certified association may make application to the Franklin Circuit Court for an order enjoining the act or acts or practices, and obtain a restraining order and preliminary injunction against the person.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 182, § 17, effective July 15, 1998.